Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.100

Filing—Types of petitions. (Effective until July 1, 2025.)

(1) There exists an action known as a petition for a protection order. The following types of petitions for a protection order may be filed:

(a) A petition for a domestic violence protection order, which must allege the existence of domestic violence committed against the petitioner or petitioners by an intimate partner or a family or household member. The petitioner may petition for relief on behalf of himself or herself and on behalf of family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults. A petition for a domestic violence protection order must specify whether the petitioner and the respondent are intimate partners or family or household members. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted or stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order or a stalking protection order.

(b) A petition for a sexual assault protection order, which must allege the existence of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration that was committed against the petitioner by the respondent. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order. A single incident of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration is sufficient grounds for a petition for a sexual assault protection order. The petitioner may petition for a sexual assault protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(c) A petition for a stalking protection order, which must allege the existence of stalking committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. A petitioner who has been stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a stalking protection order. The petitioner may petition for a stalking protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(d) A petition for a vulnerable adult protection order, which must allege that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, is a vulnerable adult and that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected, or is threatened with abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect, by the respondent.

(e) A petition for an extreme risk protection order, which must allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing, accessing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm. The petition must also identify information the petitioner is able to provide about the firearms, such as the number, types, and locations of any firearms the petitioner believes to be in the respondent's current ownership, possession, custody, access, or control. A petition for an extreme risk protection order may be filed by (i) an intimate partner or a family or household member of the respondent; or (ii) a law enforcement agency.

(f) A petition for an antiharassment protection order, which must allege the existence of unlawful harassment committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. If a petitioner is seeking relief based on domestic violence, nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or stalking, the petitioner may, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking protection order, rather than an antiharassment order. The petitioner may petition for an antiharassment protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(2) With the exception of vulnerable adult protection orders, a person under 18 years of age who is 15 years of age or older may seek relief under this chapter as a petitioner and is not required to seek relief through a petition filed on his or her behalf. He or she may also petition on behalf of a family or household member who is a minor if chosen by the minor and capable of pursuing the minor's stated interest in the action.

(3) A person under 15 years of age who is seeking relief under this chapter is required to seek relief by a person authorized as a petitioner under this section.

(4) If a petition for a protection order is filed by an interested person, the affidavit or declaration must also include a statement of why the petitioner qualifies as an interested person.

(5) A petition for any type of protection order must not be dismissed or denied on the basis that the conduct alleged by the petitioner would meet the criteria for the issuance of another type of protection order. If a petition meets the criteria for a different type of protection order other than the one sought by the petitioner, the court shall consider the petitioner's preference, and enter a temporary protection order or set the matter for a hearing as appropriate under the law. The court's decision on the appropriate type of order shall not be premised on alleviating any potential stigma on the respondent.

(6) The protection order petition must contain a section where the petitioner, regardless of petition type, may request specific relief provided for in RCW 7.105.310 that the petitioner seeks for himself or herself or for family or household members who are minors. The totality of selected relief, and any other relief the court deems appropriate for the petitioner, or family or household members who are minors, must be considered at the time of entry of temporary protection orders and at the time of entry of full protection orders.

(7) If a court reviewing the petition for a protection order or a request for a temporary protection order determines that the petition was not filed in the correct court, the court shall enter findings establishing the correct court, and direct the clerk to transfer the petition to the correct court and to provide notice of the transfer to all parties who have appeared.

(8) Upon filing a petition for a protection order, the petitioner may request that the court enter an ex parte temporary protection order and an order to surrender and prohibit weapons without notice until a hearing on a full protection order may be held. When requested, there shall be a rebuttable presumption to include the petitioner's minor children as protected parties in the ex parte temporary domestic violence protection order until the full hearing to reduce the risk of harm to children during periods of heightened risk, unless there is good cause not to include the minor children. If the court denies the petitioner's request to include the minor children, the court shall make written findings why the children should not be included, pending the full hearing. An ex parte temporary protection order shall be effective for a fixed period of time and shall be issued initially for a period not to exceed 14 days, which may be extended for good cause.

[ 2022 c 268 s 5; 2021 c 215 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

PDFRCW 7.105.100

Filing—Types of petitions. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

(1) There exists an action known as a petition for a protection order. The following types of petitions for a protection order may be filed:

(a) A petition for a domestic violence protection order, which must allege the existence of domestic violence committed against the petitioner or petitioners by an intimate partner or a family or household member. The petitioner may petition for relief on behalf of himself or herself and on behalf of family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults. A petition for a domestic violence protection order must specify whether the petitioner and the respondent are intimate partners or family or household members. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted or stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order or a stalking protection order.

(b) A petition for a sexual assault protection order, which must allege the existence of nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or commercial sexual exploitation that was committed against the petitioner by the respondent. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order. A single incident of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration is sufficient grounds for a petition for a sexual assault protection order. The petitioner may petition for a sexual assault protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(c) A petition for a stalking protection order, which must allege the existence of stalking committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. A petitioner who has been stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a stalking protection order. The petitioner may petition for a stalking protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(d) A petition for a vulnerable adult protection order, which must allege that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, is a vulnerable adult and that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected, or is threatened with abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect, by the respondent.

(e) A petition for an extreme risk protection order, which must allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing, accessing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm. The petition must also identify information the petitioner is able to provide about the firearms, such as the number, types, and locations of any firearms the petitioner believes to be in the respondent's current ownership, possession, custody, access, or control. A petition for an extreme risk protection order may be filed by (i) an intimate partner or a family or household member of the respondent; or (ii) a law enforcement agency.

(f) A petition for an antiharassment protection order, which must allege the existence of unlawful harassment committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. If a petitioner is seeking relief based on domestic violence, nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or stalking, the petitioner may, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking protection order, rather than an antiharassment order. The petitioner may petition for an antiharassment protection order on behalf of:

(i) Himself or herself;

(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;

(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or

(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.

(2) With the exception of vulnerable adult protection orders, a person under 18 years of age who is 15 years of age or older may seek relief under this chapter as a petitioner and is not required to seek relief through a petition filed on his or her behalf. He or she may also petition on behalf of a family or household member who is a minor if chosen by the minor and capable of pursuing the minor's stated interest in the action.

(3) A person under 15 years of age who is seeking relief under this chapter is required to seek relief by a person authorized as a petitioner under this section.

(4) If a petition for a protection order is filed by an interested person, the affidavit or declaration must also include a statement of why the petitioner qualifies as an interested person.

(5) A petition for any type of protection order must not be dismissed or denied on the basis that the conduct alleged by the petitioner would meet the criteria for the issuance of another type of protection order. If a petition meets the criteria for a different type of protection order other than the one sought by the petitioner, the court shall consider the petitioner's preference, and enter a temporary protection order or set the matter for a hearing as appropriate under the law. The court's decision on the appropriate type of order shall not be premised on alleviating any potential stigma on the respondent.

(6) The protection order petition must contain a section where the petitioner, regardless of petition type, may request specific relief provided for in RCW 7.105.310 that the petitioner seeks for himself or herself or for family or household members who are minors. The totality of selected relief, and any other relief the court deems appropriate for the petitioner, or family or household members who are minors, must be considered at the time of entry of temporary protection orders and at the time of entry of full protection orders.

(7) If a court reviewing the petition for a protection order or a request for a temporary protection order determines that the petition was not filed in the correct court, the court shall enter findings establishing the correct court, and direct the clerk to transfer the petition to the correct court and to provide notice of the transfer to all parties who have appeared.

(8) Upon filing a petition for a protection order, the petitioner may request that the court enter an ex parte temporary protection order and an order to surrender and prohibit weapons without notice until a hearing on a full protection order may be held. When requested, there shall be a rebuttable presumption to include the petitioner's minor children as protected parties in the ex parte temporary domestic violence protection order until the full hearing to reduce the risk of harm to children during periods of heightened risk, unless there is good cause not to include the minor children. If the court denies the petitioner's request to include the minor children, the court shall make written findings why the children should not be included, pending the full hearing. An ex parte temporary protection order shall be effective for a fixed period of time and shall be issued initially for a period not to exceed 14 days, which may be extended for good cause.

[ 2024 c 298 s 10; 2022 c 268 s 5; 2021 c 215 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 298: See note following RCW 9A.40.100.

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.